Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-167
Emergency measures; exemption; issued by Governor.

Any person, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation may appeal to the Governor requesting a partial or complete exemption from the emergency measures ordered pursuant to sections 84-162 to 84-167. Any such exemption issued by the Governor shall be in writing and shall clearly identify those persons exempted, the scope of such exemption, and the reasons for granting such exemptions.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 56;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 548.